Maryland, session 2025, SB0467.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
5–2001.
(a) In this section, “Fund” means the Maryland Forestry Education Fund.
(b) There is a Maryland Forestry Education Fund.
(c) The purpose of the Fund is to expand and enhance:
(1) The Maryland Forestry Foundation’s capacity to provide education and
resources that support Maryland’s forest landowners;
(2) The ability of district forestry boards and the knowledge of local
governments in Maryland to achieve:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0467*

SENATE BILL 467
(i) Environmental, economic, and social sustainability of forest
health; and
(ii) The sustainable management of forest resources; and
(3) The ability of businesses to test innovative best management practices
in forestry.
(d) The Maryland Forestry Foundation shall administer the Fund.
(e) (1) The Fund is a special, nonlapsing fund that is not subject to § 7–302 of
the State Finance and Procurement Article.
(2) The State Treasurer shall hold the Fund separately, and the
Comptroller shall account for the Fund.
(f) The Fund consists of:
(1) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
(2) Interest earnings; and
(3) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit of the
Fund.
(g) The Fund may be used only for:
(1) Providing training and education to forest landowners, district forestry
boards, and local governments to ensure the landowners, boards, and governments are well
informed on advances and developments in:
(i) Healthy forest management;
(ii) Ecological service markets;
(iii) Emerging forestry threats;
(iv) Climate science;
(v) Forest conservation;
(vi) Urban forestry;
(vii) Sustainability science;
(viii) Forestry policy;

SENATE BILL 467 3
(ix) Forestry practices; and
(x) Resource options that promote the multiple benefits of forest
management;
(2) Providing outreach and engagement that builds local capacity and
institutionalizes sustainability efforts within communities and the district forestry boards,
including:
(i) Holding a forest sustainability conference once every 2 years;
(ii) Implementing a peer–to–peer learning exchange; and
(iii) Providing healthy forest presentations;
(3) Developing and expanding a healthy forest education and conservation
program;
(4) Improving the outreach of district forestry boards by providing
education, recognition, strategies, and actions the boards can implement;
(5) Providing small grants to district forestry boards, forest landowners,
local governments, and businesses to test innovative best management practices in
forestry;
(6) Recognizing the efforts forest landowners and local governments make
toward achieving healthy, sustainable forest management; and
(7) Expenses related to the administration of the Fund.
(h) (1) The State Treasurer shall invest the money of the Fund in the same
manner as other State money may be invested.
(2) Any interest earnings of the Fund shall be credited to the Fund.
(i) Expenditures from the Fund may be made only in accordance with the State
budget.
(j) Money expended from the Fund for the outreach, training, education, and
grants under subsection (g) of this section is supplemental to and is not intended to take
the place of funding that otherwise would be appropriated for forestry education and
outreach.
(k) For fiscal years 2025 [and 2026] THROUGH 2031, the Governor shall include
in the annual budget bill an appropriation of $250,000 to the Fund.

SENATE BILL 467
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.